Vermont statutes. Title 21 Labor
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 1501.
Title and declaration of policy.

This chapter shall be known as the State Labor Relations Act.

It is the purpose and policy of this chapter to prescribe the legitimate rights of both employees and employers in their relations with each other, to provide orderly and peaceful procedures for preventing the interference by either with the legitimate rights of the other, to protect the rights of individual employees in their relations with labor organizations, to define and proscribe practices on the part of labor and management which are harmful to the general welfare, and to protect the rights of the public in connection with labor disputes.

HISTORY:

1967, No. 198

, § 1; amended

1969, No. 51

, § 1, eff. April 8, 1969.

§ 1502.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Board” means the State Labor Relations Board established under

3 V.S.A. § 921

.

“Chair” means the Chair of the Board.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Labor.

“Collective bargaining” or “bargaining collectively” means the process of negotiating terms, tenure, or conditions of employment between one or more employers and representatives of employees with the intent to arrive at an agreement that, when reached, shall be reduced to writing.

“Collective bargaining unit” means the employees of an employer being either all of the employees, the members of a craft, or the employees of a plant or subdivision thereof.

“Employee” includes any employee, and is not limited to the employees of a particular employer unless this chapter explicitly states otherwise, and includes any individual whose work has ceased as a consequence of, or in connection with, any current labor dispute or because of any unfair labor practice and who has not obtained any other regular and substantially equivalent employment, but does not include an individual;

employed as an agricultural laborer;

employed by his or her parent or spouse;

employed in the domestic service of any family or person at his or her home;

having the status of an independent contractor;

employed as a supervisor;

employed by an employer subject to the Railway Labor Act as amended from time to time; or

employed by any other person who is not an employer as defined in subdivision (7) of this section.

“Employer” means any person employing five or more employees and any person acting as an agent of an employer, employing five or more employees, directly or indirectly, but does not include:

The United States or any wholly owned government corporation or any federal reserve bank.

This State or any political subdivision thereof or any incorporated or interstate school district.

Any person subject to the Railway Labor Act, as amended from time to time.

Any labor organization (other than when acting as an employer), or anyone acting in the capacity of officer or agent of such labor organization.

A person operating a hospital or a nursing home, if no part of the net earnings inures to the benefit of a private individual or shareholder.

“Labor dispute” includes any controversy concerning terms, tenure, or conditions of employment, or concerning the association or representation of persons in negotiating, fixing, maintaining, changing, or seeking to arrange terms or conditions of employment, regardless of whether the disputants stand in the proximate relation of employer and employee.

“Labor organization” means an organization of any kind or any agency or any employee representation committee or plan in which employees participate and that exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employees concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of employment, or conditions of work.

“Person” includes one or more individuals, labor organizations, partnerships, associations, corporations, legal representatives, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, or receivers.

“Professional employee” means:

any employee engaged in work:

predominantly intellectual and varied in character as opposed to routine mental, manual, mechanical, or physical work;

involving the consistent exercise of discretion and judgment in its performance;

of such character that the output produced or the result accomplished cannot be standardized in relation to a given period of time; and

requiring knowledge of an advanced type in a field of science or learning customarily acquired by a prolonged course of specialized intellectual instruction and study in an institution of higher learning or a hospital, as distinguished from a general academic education or from an apprenticeship or from training in the performance of routine mental, manual, or physical processes; or

any employee who:

has completed the courses of specialized intellectual instruction and study described in subdivision (A)(iv) of this subdivision (11); and

is performing related work under the supervision of a professional person to qualify himself or herself to become a professional employee as defined in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (11).

“Representatives” includes any individual or labor organization.

“Supervisor” means an individual having authority, in the interest of the employer, to hire, transfer, suspend, lay off, recall, promote, discharge, assign, reward, or discipline other employees or responsibly to direct them, or to adjust their grievances, or effectively to recommend such action, if in connection with the foregoing the exercise of such authority is not of a merely routine or clerical nature but requires the use of independent judgment.

“Agency fee” means a fee deducted by an employer from the salary or wages of an employee who is not a member of an employee organization, which is paid to the employee organization that is the exclusive bargaining agent for the bargaining unit of the employee. An agency fee shall not exceed 85 percent of the amount payable as dues by members of the employee organization and shall be deducted in the same manner as dues are deducted from the salary or wages of members of the employee organization and shall be used to defray the costs of chargeable activities.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 198

, § 2; amended

1967, No. 71

, § 1;

1975, No. 152

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2005, No. 103

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 5, 2006;

2013, No. 37

, § 13, eff. June 30, 2013;

2017, No. 74

, § 55;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 149.

§ 1503.
Rights of employees; mutual duty to bargain.

Employees shall have the right to self-organization; to form, join, or assist labor organizations; to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choice, and to engage in concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection, and shall also have the right to refrain from any or all such activities, except to the extent that such right may be affected by an agreement requiring membership in a labor organization as a condition of employment as authorized in subsection 1621(a) of this title. An employee who exercises the right not to join the labor organization representing the employee’s certified unit pursuant to section 1581 of this title shall, subject to subsection (b) of this section, pay the agency fee to the representative of the bargaining unit in the same manner as employees who pay membership fees to the representative. The labor organization agrees to indemnify and hold the employer harmless from any and all claims stemming from the implementation or administration of the agency fee.

A labor organization shall not charge the agency fee unless it has established and maintained a procedure to provide nonmembers with:

An audited financial statement that identifies the major categories of expenses and divides them into chargeable and nonchargeable expenses.

An opportunity to object to the amount of the agency fee sought, and to place in escrow any amount reasonably in dispute.

Prompt arbitration by an arbitrator selected jointly by the objecting fee payer and the labor organization or pursuant to the rules of the American Arbitration Association to resolve any objection over the amount of the agency fee. The costs of arbitration shall be paid by the labor organization.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 198

, § 3; amended

2013, No. 37

, § 14, eff. June 30, 2013;

2017, No. 74

, § 56.

§ 1504.
General duties.

All employers, their officers, agents, and employees or representatives shall exert every reasonable effort to make and maintain agreements concerning rates of pay, rules, wages, hours of employment, and conditions of work, and to settle all disputes, whether arising out of the application of those agreements or growing out of any dispute between the employer and the employees thereof.

All labor disputes between employers and their employees shall, upon the request of either party, be considered within 15 days of the request, or at such times as may be mutually agreed to, and, if possible, settled, with all expedition, in conference between representatives designated and authorized so to confer, by the employer or by the employees thereof interested in the dispute. However, this obligation does not compel either party to agree to a proposal or make a concession.

HISTORY:

1967, No. 198

, § 4.

§ 1505.
Application.

This chapter shall not apply to any employer or any labor dispute which affects commerce within the meaning of the National Labor Relations Act, as amended, unless the National Labor Relations Board shall have ceded jurisdiction thereof to the Board pursuant to section 10(a) of the Act or shall have declined to assert jurisdiction thereof pursuant to section 14(c) of the Act.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 198

, § 17.